District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.16

Administrative penalty.

The Mayor may assess a civil penalty against an athlete agent not to exceed $25,000 for a violation of this part.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.